Utah statutes.
41-1a-301.   Apportioned registration and licensing of interstate vehicles.
(1) (a)  An owner or operator of a fleet of commercial vehicles based in this
state and operating in two or more jurisdictions may register commercial
vehicles for operation under the International Registration Plan or the
Uniform Vehicle Registration Proration and Reciprocity Agreement by filing an
application with the division.
(b)  The application shall include information that identifies the vehicle
owner, the vehicle, the miles traveled in each jurisdiction, and other
information pertinent to the registration of apportioned vehicles.
(c)  Vehicles operated exclusively in this state may not be apportioned.
(2) (a)  If no operations were conducted during the preceding year, the
application shall contain a statement of the proposed operations and an
estimate of annual mileage for each jurisdiction.
(b)  The division may adjust the estimate if the division is not satisfied
with its correctness.
(c)  At renewal, the registrant shall use the actual mileage from the
preceding year in computing fees due each jurisdiction.
(3)  The registration fee for apportioned vehicles shall be determined as
follows:
(a)  divide the in-jurisdiction miles by the total miles generated during the
preceding year;
(b)  total the fees for each vehicle based on the fees prescribed in Section
41-1a-1206; and
(c)  multiply the sum obtained under Subsection (3)(b) by the quotient
obtained under Subsection (3)(a).
(4)  Trailers or semitrailers of apportioned fleets may be listed separately
as "trailer fleets" with the fees paid according to the total distance those
trailers were towed in all jurisdictions during the preceding year mileage
reporting period.
(5) (a) (i)  When the proper fees have been paid and the property tax or in
lieu fee has been cleared under Section 41-1a-206 or 41-1a-207, a registration
card, annual decal, and where necessary, license plate, will be issued for
each unit listed on the application.
(ii)  An original registration must be carried in each vehicle at all times.
(b)  Original registration cards for trailers or semitrailers may be carried
in the power unit.
(c) (i)  In lieu of a permanent registration card or license plate, the
division may issue one temporary permit authorizing operation of new or
unlicensed vehicles until the permanent registration is completed.
(ii)  Once a temporary permit is issued, the registration process may not be
cancelled.  Registration must be completed and the fees and any property tax
or in lieu fee due must be paid for the vehicle for which the permit was
issued.
(iii)  Temporary permits may not be issued for renewals.
(d) (i)  The division shall issue one distinctive license plate that displays
the letters APP for apportioned vehicles.
(ii)  The plate shall be displayed on the front of an apportioned truck
tractor or power unit or on the rear of any apportioned vehicle.
(iii)  Distinctive decals displaying the word "apportioned" and the month and
year of expiration shall be issued for each apportioned vehicle.
(e)  A nonrefundable administrative fee, determined by the commission pursuant
to Section 63J-1-504, shall be charged for each temporary permit,
registration, or both.
(6)  Vehicles that are apportionally registered are fully registered for
intrastate and interstate  movements, providing the proper interstate and
intrastate authority has been secured.
(7) (a)  Vehicles added to an apportioned fleet after the beginning of the
registration year shall be registered by applying the quotient under
Subsection (3)(a) for the original application to the fees due for the
remainder of the registration year.
(b) (i)  The owner shall maintain and submit complete annual mileage for each
vehicle in each jurisdiction, showing all miles operated by the lessor and
lessee.
(ii)  The fiscal mileage reporting period begins July 1, and continues through
June 30 of the year immediately preceding the calendar year in which the
registration year begins.
(c) (i)  An owner-operator, who is a lessor, may be the registrant and the
vehicle may be registered in the name of the owner-operator.
(ii)  The identification plates and registration card shall be the property of
the lessor and may reflect both the owner-operator's name and that of the
carrier as lessee.
(iii)  The allocation of fees shall be according to the operational records of
the owner-operator.
(d) (i)  The lessee may be the registrant of a leased vehicle at the option of
the lessor.
(ii)  If a lessee is the registrant of a leased vehicle, both the lessor's and
lessee's name shall appear on the registration.
(iii)  The allocation of fees shall be according to the records of the
carrier.
(8) (a)  Any registrant whose application for apportioned registration has
been accepted shall preserve the records on which the application is based for
a period of three years after the close of the registration year.
(b)  The records shall be made available to the division upon request for
audit as to accuracy of computations, payments, and assessments for
deficiencies, or allowances for credits.
(c)  An assessment for deficiency or claim for credit may not be made for any
period for which records are no longer required.
(d)  Interest in the amount prescribed by Section 59-1-402 shall be assessed
or paid from the date due until paid on deficiencies found due after audit.
(e)  Registrants with deficiencies are subject to the penalties under Section
59-1-401.
(f)  The division may enter into agreements with other International
Registration Plan jurisdictions for joint audits.
(9) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (9)(b), all state fees collected
under this section shall be deposited in the Transportation Fund.
(b)  The following fees may be used by the commission as a dedicated credit to
cover the costs of electronic credentialing as provided in Section 41-1a-303:
(i)  $5 of each temporary registration permit fee paid under Subsection
(12)(a)(i) for a single unit; and
(ii)  $10 of each temporary registration permit fee paid under Subsection
(12)(a)(ii) for multiple units.
(10)  If registration is for less than a full year, fees for apportioned
registration shall be assessed according to Section 41-1a-1207.
(a) (i)  If the registrant is replacing a vehicle for one withdrawn from the
fleet and the new vehicle is of the same weight category as the replaced
vehicle, the registrant must file a supplemental application.
(ii)  A registration card that transfers the license plate to the new vehicle
shall be issued.
(iii)  When a replacement vehicle is of greater weight than the replaced
vehicle, additional registration fees are due.
(b)  If a vehicle is withdrawn from an apportioned fleet during the period for
which it is registered, the registrant shall notify the division and surrender
the registration card and license plate of the withdrawn vehicle.
(11) (a)  An out-of-state carrier with an apportionally registered vehicle who
has not presented a certificate of property tax or in lieu fee as required by
Section 41-1a-206 or 41-1a-207, shall pay, at the time of registration, a
proportional part of an equalized highway use tax computed as follows:
(i)  Multiply the number of vehicles or combination vehicles registered in
each weight class by the equivalent tax figure from the following tables:
Vehicle or Combination
   Registered Weight                    Age of Vehicle
Equivalent Tax
12,000 pounds or less                  12 or more years
$10
12,000 pounds or less                   9 or more years but less than 12 years
$50
12,000 pounds or less                  6 or more years but less than 9 years
$80
12,000 pounds or less                  3 or more years but less than 6 years
$110
12,000 pounds or less                  Less than 3 years
$150
Vehicle or Combination  Equivalent
  Registered Weight                  Tax
12,001 - 18,000 pounds     $150
18,001 - 34,000 pounds       200
34,001 - 48,000 pounds       300
48,001 - 64,000 pounds       450
64,001 pounds and over       600
(ii)  Multiply the equivalent tax value for the total fleet determined under
Subsection (11)(a)(i) by the fraction computed under Subsection (3) for the
apportioned fleet for the registration year.
(b)  Fees shall be assessed as provided in Section 41-1a-1207.
(12) (a)  Commercial vehicles meeting the registration requirements of another
jurisdiction may, as an alternative to full or apportioned registration,
secure a temporary registration permit for a period not to exceed 96 hours or
until they leave the state, whichever is less, for a fee of:
(i)  $25 for a single unit; and
(ii)  $50 for multiple units.
(b)  A state temporary permit or registration fee is not required from
nonresident owners or operators of vehicles or combination of vehicles having
a gross laden weight of 26,000 pounds or less for each single unit or
combination.
